Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0661, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, "qualifying child" has the meaning given in section 32(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, except: (1) excluding individuals who attained the age of deleted text begin 18deleted text end new text begin 19new text end or greater in the taxable year; and (2) section 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0671, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Definitions. For purposes of this section, "qualifying older child" means a qualifying child, as defined in section 32(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, that attained at least the age of deleted text begin 18deleted text end new text begin 19new text end in the taxable year. For the purposes of determining a qualifying older child, section 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end